Utah statutes.
57-12-9.   Rules of displacing agency.
(1) (a)  A displacing agency may enact rules to assure that:
(i)  the payments and assistance authorized by this chapter are administered
in a manner that is fair, reasonable, and as uniform as practicable;
(ii)  a displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized
by this chapter is paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, is paid
in advance; and
(iii)  any person aggrieved by a determination as to eligibility for a payment
authorized by this chapter, or the amount of a payment, may have the person's
application reviewed by the head of the displacing agency.
(b)  Each displacing agency that has not adopted rules under Subsection (1)(a)
shall comply with the rules promulgated by the Utah Department of
Transportation relating to displaced persons in right-of-way acquisitions.
(2)  Each displacing agency shall comply with the procedures and requirements
of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in its adjudicative
proceedings.
